Washington statutes.
RCW 10.21.070

Release order—Requirements.

In a release order issued under RCW 10.21.030 the judicial officer must:

(1) Include a written statement that sets forth all the conditions to which the release is subject, in a manner sufficiently clear and specific to serve as a guide for the defendant's conduct; and

(2) Advise the defendant of:

(a) The penalties for violating a condition of release, including the penalties for committing an offense while on pretrial release; and

(b) The consequences of violating a condition of release, including the immediate issuance of a warrant for the defendant's arrest.

[ 2010 c 254 s 9.]

NOTES:

Intent—Contingent effective date—2010 c 254: See notes following RCW 10.21.010.